Washington statutes.
RCW 13.40.560

Juvenile accountability incentive account.

*** CHANGE IN 2025 *** (SEE 1468-S.SL) ***

The juvenile accountability incentive account is created in the custody of the state treasurer. Federal awards for juvenile accountability incentives received by the secretary of the department shall be deposited into the account. Interest earned from the inception of the trust account shall be deposited in the account. Expenditures from the account may be used only for the purposes specified in the federal award or awards. Moneys in the account may be spent only after appropriation.

[ 2017 3rd sp.s. c 6 s 624; 1999 c 182 s 1.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2017 3rd sp.s. c 6 ss 601-631, 701-728, and 804: See note following RCW 13.04.011.

Conflict with federal requirements—2017 3rd sp.s. c 6: See RCW 43.216.908.